Massachusetts, session 194th, S2046.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after clause Twenty-second H, the following clause:-
Twenty-second I. Real estate of soldiers and sailors who are legal residents of the
commonwealth who are veterans, as defined in clause forty-third of section seven of chapter
four, and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other than
dishonorable conditions, and who were domiciled in the commonwealth for at least 6 months
prior to entering service or resided in the commonwealth for 1 consecutive year prior to the date
of filing for exemption pursuant to this clause, and who is 65 years of age or older, and who
according to the records of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or of any branch of
the armed forces of the United States by reason of injury received while in service and in the line
of 2

of duty are partially or have a disability rating of 100 per cent; to the amount of the percentage
equal to the percentage of the veteran’s permanent, service-connected disability as determined by
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; provided, that the real estate is occupied as the
veteran's domicile; provided, further, that if the property is greater than a single-family house,
then only that value of so much of the house as is occupied by the person as the person's
domicile shall be exempted; and provided, further, that an exemption pursuant to this clause shall
continue unchanged for the benefit of the surviving spouse after the death of the disabled veteran
as long as the surviving spouse of the qualified veteran shall remain an owner and occupant of a
domicile subject to the exemption, and the surviving spouse is 65 years of age or older.
The amount of the exemption shall be borne by the commonwealth, and the state
treasurer shall annually reimburse the city or town for the amount of the tax which otherwise
would have been collected for this exemption.
of 2